Hawaii, session 2026, HB1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Keaukaha homestead in Hilo, Hawaii marked their one-hundred-year anniversary last year.  It is considered one of the pioneers of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act as it is the second Hawaiian homestead project in the State.  The homestead location is near ocean waters and according to the Hawaii Cesspool Prioritization Tool, cesspools in this area are priority level 1 that have the greatest potential to impact human health and the environment and are directly adjacent to sensitive natural resources like coral reefs or drinking water aquifers. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of Hawaiian home lands to expand the sewer network and lines within and throughout the Keaukaha homestead. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $6,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the expansion of the sewer network and lines through department of Hawaiian home lands parcels in Keaukaha in Hilo, Hawaii; provided that funds may also be used for interconnection to the sewer network by individual homesteads and transferred to the county of Hawaii for the same purpose. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________